District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.07

Reorganization.

The Director of DDOT is authorized to organize the personnel and property transferred herein within any organizational unit of DDOT as the Director deems appropriate.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 8, 49 DCR 3444
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 77(b), 52 DCR 2638

History

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “DDOT” for “DOT”.

Effect of Amendments